Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.610

Mandatory assignment of retirement benefits—Order—Answer—Form.

The answer of the department shall be made on forms, served on the director with the mandatory benefits assignment order, substantially as follows:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE

STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR THE

COUNTY OF . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . .

No.

. . . .

Obligee

vs.

ANSWER TO

. . . .

MANDATORY BENEFITS

Obligor

ASSIGNMENT ORDER

. . . .

Department of Retirement Systems of

the State of Washington

1. At the time of the service of the mandatory benefits assignment order on the department, was the above-named obligor receiving periodic retirement payments from the department of retirement systems?

Yes . . . . . . No . . . . . . (check one).

2. At the time of the service of the mandatory benefits assignment order on the department, had the above-named obligor requested a withdrawal of accumulated contributions from the department?

Yes . . . . . . No . . . . . . (check one).

3. Are there any other court or administrative orders on file with the department currently in effect directing the department to withhold all or a portion of the obligor's benefits?

Yes . . . . . . No . . . . . . (check one).

4. If the answer to question one or two is yes and the department cannot comply fully with the mandatory benefits assignment order, provide an explanation.

I declare under the laws of the state of Washington that the foregoing is true and correct to the best of my knowledge.

. . . .

. . . .

Signature of director

Date and place

or

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

Signature of person

Place

answering for director

. . . .

Connection with director

[ 1987 c 326 s 12.]